Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,107
Individual contract, defined.

Individual contract shall mean a contract for health care services issued to and covering an individual. The individual contract may include coverage for dependents of the subscriber.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 16.